Idaho, session 2026, S1403.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Environmental Quality the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. WATER QUALITY:
FROM:
IPDES Program
Fund $181,700 $200,000 $381,700
II. WASTE MANAGEMENT AND REMEDIATION:
FROM:
Environmental Remediation (Triumph Mine)
Fund $200,000 $1,000,000 $30,000 $1,230,000
Solid Waste Regulatory
Fund 350,000 35,000 $15,000 0 400,000
TOTAL $550,000 $1,035,000 $15,000 $30,000 $1,630,000
GRAND TOTAL $731,700 $1,235,000 $15,000 $30,000 $2,011,700


SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Environmental Quality for the
Water Quality Program is hereby reduced by $181,700 from the Department of
Environmental Quality (Federal) Fund from personnel costs for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Environmental Quality is hereby increased by four
(4.00) for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4. CASH TRANSFER FOR AIR PERMITTING FEES. There is hereby ap-
propriated and the Office of the State Controller shall transfer the balance
of the DEQ Air Permitting Fees Account to the Idaho Air Quality Permitting
Fund on July 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, to consolidate the two funds and cease to use
the DEQ Air Permitting Fees Account.
SECTION 5. CASH TRANSFER FOR DRINKING WATER FEES. There is hereby ap-
propriated and the Office of the State Controller shall transfer the balance
of the DEQ Drinking Water Fees Account to the Public Water System Supervision
Fund on July 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, to consolidate the two funds and cease to use
the DEQ Drinking Water Fees Account.
SECTION 6. CASH TRANSFER FOR SOLID WASTE. There is hereby appropriated
and the Office of the State Controller shall transfer $400,000 from the
Hazardous Waste Emergency Fund to the Solid Waste Regulatory Fund on July
1, 2026, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.